Florida, session 2026, SB618.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 627.171, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 627.171âExcess rates.â 15 (2)(a)âAn insurer may not use excess rates pursuant to this 16 section, only as follows: 17 1.âFor no more than 10 percent of its commercial insurance 18 policies written or renewed in each calendar year for any line 19 of commercial insurance, other than workersâ compensation. 20 2.âFor no more than 20 percent of its workersâ compensation 21 insurance policies written or renewed in each calendar year. or 22 3.âFor no more than 5 percent of its personal lines 23 insurance policies written or renewed in each calendar year for 24 any line of personal insurance. 25 (b)âIn determining the 20 percent 10-percent limitation for 26 workersâ compensation commercial insurance policies, the insurer 27 shall exclude any workersâ compensation policy that was written 28 for an employer who had coverage in the joint underwriting plan 29 created by s. 627.311(5) immediately before prior to the writing 30 of the policy by the insurer and any workersâ compensation 31 policy that was written for an employer who had been offered 32 coverage in the joint underwriting plan but who was written a 33 policy by the insurer in lieu of accepting the joint 34 underwriting plan policy. Such These workersâ compensation 35 policies must shall be excluded from the 20 percent 10-percent 36 limitation for the first 3 years of coverage. 37 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 631.912, Florida 38 Statutes, is amended to read: 39 631.912âBoard of directors.â 40 (1)âThe board of directors of the corporation shall be 41 composed consist of nine 11 persons, one 1 of whom is the 42 insurance consumer advocate appointed under s. 627.0613 or his 43 or her designee and one 1 of whom is designated by the Chief 44 Financial Officer. The department shall appoint to the board 45 four 6 persons selected by private carriers from among the 20 46 workersâ compensation insurers with the largest amount of direct 47 written premium as determined by the department, one person 48 nominated by a statewide trade association representing Florida 49 employers, which is designated by the Chief Financial Officer, 50 and one person nominated by the largest property and casualty 51 insurance agents association in this state. The Chief Financial 52 Officer may appoint and 2 persons selected by the self-insurance 53 funds or other persons with experience in workersâ compensation 54 insurance to the board to serve in place of a nominee of either 55 association as determined by the Chief Financial Officer. These 56 appointments are deemed to be within the scope of the exemption 57 provided in s. 112.313(7)(b). The Governor shall appoint one 58 person who has commercial insurance experience. At least two of 59 the private carriers shall be foreign carriers authorized to do 60 business in this state. The board shall elect a chair 61 chairperson from among its members. The Chief Financial Officer 62 may remove any board member for cause. Each board member shall 63 be appointed to serve a 4-year term and may be reappointed. A 64 vacancy on the board must shall be filled for the remaining 65 period of the term in the same manner by which the original 66 appointment was made. 67 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.